Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
ARTICLE 3 Guardianship of Adult

§ 93-20-301.
Basis for appointment of guardian for adult.

The court may appoint a guardian for an adult when the respondent lacks the ability to meet essential requirements for physical health, safety or self-care because:

The adult is unable to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions, even with appropriate supportive services or technological assistance; or

The adult is found to be a person with mental illness or a person with an intellectual disability as defined in Section 41-21-61 who is also incapable of taking care of his or her person.

The court shall grant to a guardian appointed under subsection (1) only those powers necessitated by the limitations and demonstrated needs of the ward and must enter orders that will encourage the development of the ward’s maximum self-determination and independence. The court must consider any less restrictive alternative that would meet the needs of the ward.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-302.
Petition for appointment of guardian for adult.

A proceeding under this article may be instituted by the chancellor or clerk of the chancery court, any relative or friend of the adult, or any other interested party, including the adult for whom the order is sought, by filing a sworn petition in the chancery court of the county of the residence of the adult, setting forth that the adult is alleged to be in need of a guardianship.

The petition must state the name and address of an attorney representing the petitioner, if any, and must set forth under the style of the case and before the body of the petition the following language in bold or highlighted type:

“THE RELIEF SOUGHT HEREIN MAY AFFECT YOUR LEGAL RIGHTS. YOU HAVE A RIGHT TO NOTICE OF ANY HEARING ON THIS PETITION, TO ATTEND ANY SUCH HEARING, AND TO BE REPRESENTED BY AN ATTORNEY.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-303.
Notice of hearing for appointment of guardian for adult.

On receipt of a petition under Section 93-20-302 for appointment of a guardian for a respondent who is an adult, the court must set a date, time and place for a hearing, and shall cause not less than seven (7) days’ notice thereof to be given to the adult for whom the guardian is to be appointed, except that the court may, for good cause shown, direct that a shorter notice be given.

In a proceeding on a petition under Section 93-20-302, notice of the hearing must also be given to any of the persons required to be listed in the petition under subsection (3) and any other person the court determines is entitled to notice. Failure to give notice does not preclude the court from appointing a guardian.

Unless the court finds that the adult for whom the guardian is to be appointed is competent and joins in the petition, the notice shall also be given to:

Any conservator appointed to the respondent; and

The following persons, listed in order of preference, so that personal service is had on the person for whom the guardian is to be appointed and on at least one (1) relative who resides in Mississippi, other than the petitioner:

Each of the spouse, children, parents and siblings of the adult for whom the guardian is to be appointed, but if none of those can be found, then to:

One (1) adult relative of the person for whom the guardian is to be appointed who is not the petitioner and who resides in Mississippi if that relative is within the third degree of kinship. If no relative within the third degree of kinship to the person for whom the guardian is to be appointed is found residing in the State of Mississippi, the court shall either designate some other appropriate person to receive the notice or appoint a guardian ad litem to receive notice.

If the person for whom the guardian is to be appointed is entitled to any benefit, estate or income paid or payable by or through the Veterans’ Administration of the United States government, such administration must also be given notice.

Notice of a hearing on a petition seeking an order under this article that is filed after the appointment of a guardian, together with a copy of the petition, must be given to the respondent, the guardian, and any other person the court determines.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-304.
Appointment of guardian ad litem.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to any respondent and allow suitable compensation payable out of the estate of the respondent, but the appointment shall not be made except when the court considers it necessary for the protection of the interest of the respondent; a judgment of any court is not void or erroneous for failure to have a guardian ad litem.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-305.
Professional evaluation.

The chancery court must conduct a hearing to determine whether a guardian is needed for the respondent. Before the hearing, the court, in its discretion, may appoint a guardian ad litem to look after the interest of the person in question; the guardian ad litem must be present at the hearing and present the interests of the respondent for whose person a guardian is to be appointed.

The chancery judge shall be the judge of the number and character of the witnesses and proof to be presented, except that the proof must include certificates made after a personal examination of the respondent by the following professionals, each of whom shall make in writing a certificate of the result of that examination to be filed with the clerk of the court and become a part of the record of the case

Two (2) licensed physicians; or

One (1) licensed physician and either one (1) licensed psychologist, nurse practitioner, or physician’s assistant.

The personal examination may occur face-to-face or via telemedicine, but any telemedicine examination must be made using an audio-visual connection by a physician licensed in this state and as defined in Section 83-9-351. A nurse practitioner or physician assistant conducting an examination shall not also be in a collaborative or supervisory relationship, as the law may otherwise require, with the physician conducting the examination. A professional conducting an examination under this section may also be called to testify at the hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-306.
Rights at hearing.

At a hearing held under Section 93-20-303, the respondent may:

Present evidence and subpoena witnesses and documents;

Examine witnesses; and

Otherwise participate in the hearing.

Unless excused by the court for good cause shown, a proposed guardian must attend a hearing under Section 93-20-303.

A hearing under Section 93-20-303 must be closed upon request of the respondent and a showing of good cause.

Any person may request to participate in a hearing under Section 93-20-303. The court may grant the request, with or without a hearing, on determining that the best interest of the respondent will be served. The court may impose appropriate conditions on the person’s participation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-307.
Confidentiality of records.

An adult subject to a proceeding for a guardianship, an attorney designated by the adult, and a person entitled to notice either under Section 93-20-309(4) or a court order may access court records of the proceeding and resulting guardianship, including the guardian’s plan under Section 93-20-315 and guardian’s well-being report under Section 93-20-316. A person not otherwise entitled to access court records under this subsection may petition the court for access to court records of the guardianship, including the guardian’s report and plan, for good cause. The court shall grant access if access is in the best interest of the respondent or ward or furthers the public interest and does not endanger the welfare or financial interests of the respondent or ward.

A report under Section 93-20-304 of a guardian ad litem or a professional evaluation under Section 93-20-305 may be considered confidential and may be sealed on filing when determined necessary by the court. If the court finds the file should be sealed, the file will remain available to:

The court;

The individual who is the subject of the report or evaluation, without limitation as to use;

The petitioner, guardian ad litem, and petitioner’s and respondent’s attorneys, for purposes of the proceeding;

Unless the court orders otherwise, an agent appointed under a power of attorney for health care or power of attorney for finances in which the respondent is the principal; and

Any other person if it is in the public interest or for a purpose the court orders for good cause.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-308.
Who may be guardian for adult.

Appointment of a guardian for an adult will be at the discretion of the court and in the best interest of the respondent. If two (2) or more persons have requested responsibility as guardian for the adult, the court shall select as guardian the person the court considers best qualified. In determining the best qualified person, the court shall consider the person’s relationship with the respondent, the person’s skills, the expressed wishes of the respondent, including any designation made in a will, durable power of attorney, or health-care directive, the extent to which the person and the respondent have similar values and preferences, and the likelihood the person will be able to perform the duties of a guardian successfully. The court, acting in the best interest of the respondent, may decline to appoint as guardian a person requesting such an appointment.

If a qualified guardian under this section cannot be determined, or if other circumstances arise where the court determines that a guardian must instead be appointed, the court, at its discretion, may appoint the chancery court clerk for the county in which the proceedings were filed, to serve as the respondent’s guardian. The chancery court clerk shall serve in the capacity ordered by the court unless a conflict of interest arises or the clerk presents circumstances where the court determines the clerk’s recusal from appointment is permitted.

A person that provides paid services to the respondent, or an individual who is employed by a person who provides paid services to the respondent or is the spouse, parent, or child of an individual who provides or is employed to provide paid services to the respondent, may not be appointed as guardian unless:

The individual is related to the respondent by blood, marriage, or adoption; or

The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the person is the best qualified person available for appointment and the appointment is in the best interest of the respondent.

An owner, operator, or employee of a long-term-care institution at which the respondent is receiving care may not be appointed as guardian unless the owner, operator, or employee is related to the respondent by blood, marriage, or adoption.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-309.
Order on appointment of guardian.

A court order appointing a guardian for an adult must:

Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established that the identified needs of the respondent cannot be met by a less restrictive alternative, including use of appropriate supportive services and technological assistance; and

Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established the respondent was given proper notice of the hearing on the petition.

A court order establishing a full guardianship for an adult must state the basis for granting a full guardianship and include specific findings that support the conclusion that a limited guardianship would not meet the functional needs of the ward.

A court order establishing a limited guardianship for an adult must state the specific powers granted to the guardian.

The court, as part of an order establishing a guardianship for an adult, must identify and include the contact information for any person that subsequently is entitled to:

Notice of the rights of the adult under Section 93-20-310(2);

Notice of a change in the primary dwelling of the adult;

Notice that the guardian has delegated:

The power to manage the care of the adult;

The power to make decisions about where the adult lives;

The power to make major medical decisions on behalf of the adult;

A power that requires court approval under Section 93-20-314; or

Substantially all powers of the guardian;

A copy of the guardian’s plan under Section 93-20-315 and the guardian’s well-being report under Section 93-20-316;

Access to court records relating to the guardianship;

Notice of the death or significant change in the condition of the adult;

Notice that the court has limited or modified the powers of the guardian; and

Notice of the removal of the guardian.

A spouse and adult children of a ward are entitled to notice under Section 93-20-303(3) unless the court determines notice would be contrary to the preferences or prior directions of the ward or not in the best interest of the ward.

If the chancellor finds from the evidence that the adult is incapable of taking care of his person, the chancellor shall appoint a guardian over the person.

The costs and expenses of the proceedings shall be paid out of the estate of the person if a guardian is appointed. If a guardian is appointed and the adult has no estate, or if no guardian is appointed, then the costs and expenses must be paid by the person instituting the proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-310.
Notice of order of appointment; rights.

A guardian appointed under Section 93-20-309 must give the ward and all other persons given notice under Section 93-20-309(4) a copy of the order of appointment, together with notice of the right to request termination or modification. The order and notice must be given not later than fourteen (14) days after the appointment.

Not later than fourteen (14) days after appointment of a guardian under Section 93-20-309, the guardian must request from the court a statement of the rights of the ward and must give the statement to the ward and any other person entitled to notice under Section 93-20-303(3) or a court order. The statement must notify the ward of the right to:

Seek termination or modification of the guardianship, or removal of the guardian, and choose an attorney to represent the adult in these matters;

Be involved in decisions affecting the adult, including decisions about the adult’s care, dwelling, activities, or social interactions, to the extent reasonably feasible;

Be involved in health-care decision-making to the extent reasonably feasible and supported in understanding the risks and benefits of health-care options to the extent reasonably feasible;

Be notified at least fourteen (14) days before a change in the adult’s primary dwelling or permanent move to a nursing home, mental-health facility, or other facility that places restrictions on the individual’s ability to leave or have visitors, unless the change or move is proposed in the guardian’s plan under Section 93-20-315 or authorized by the court by specific order;

Object to a change or move described in paragraph (d) and the process for objecting;

Communicate, visit, or interact with others, including receiving visitors, and making or receiving telephone calls, personal mail, or electronic communications, including through social media, unless:

The guardian has been authorized by the court by specific order to restrict communications, visits, or interactions;

A protective order is in effect that limits contact between the adult and a person; or

The guardian has good cause to believe restriction is necessary because interaction with a specified person poses a risk of significant physical, psychological, or financial harm to the adult, and the restriction is:

1. For a period of not more than seven (7) business days if the person has a family or pre-existing social relationship with the adult; or

2. For a period of not more than sixty (60) days if the person does not have a family or pre-existing social relationship with the adult;

Receive a copy of the guardian’s plan under 93-20-315 and the guardian’s well-being report under Section 93-20-315; and

Object to the guardian’s plan or report.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-311.
Emergency guardian for adult.

On a petition by a person interested in an adult’s welfare or a petition filed under Section 93-20-302, the court may appoint an emergency guardian for the adult if the court finds:

Appointment of an emergency guardian is likely to prevent substantial harm to the adult’s physical health, safety, or welfare;

No other person appears to have authority and willingness to act in the circumstances; and

There is reason to believe that a basis for appointment of a guardian under Section 93-20-301 exists.

The duration of authority of an emergency guardian for an adult may not exceed sixty (60) days, and the emergency guardian may exercise only the powers specified in the order of appointment. The emergency guardian’s authority may be extended once for not more than sixty (60) days if the court finds that the conditions for appointment of an emergency guardian in subsection (1) continue.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), reasonable notice of the date, time, and place of a hearing on the petition must be given to the respondent, the respondent’s attorney, and any other person the court determines.

The court may appoint an emergency guardian for an adult without notice to the adult and any attorney for the adult only if the court finds from an affidavit or testimony that the respondent’s physical health, safety, or welfare will be substantially harmed before a hearing with notice on the appointment can be held. If the court appoints an emergency guardian without giving notice under subsection (3), the court must give notice of the appointment not later than forty-eight (48) hours after the appointment to:

The respondent;

The respondent’s attorney;

Any other person the court determines; and

Hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment not later than five (5) days after the appointment.

Appointment of an emergency guardian under this section is not a final determination that a basis exists for appointment of a guardian under Section 93-20-301.

The court may remove an emergency guardian appointed under this section at any time. The emergency guardian must make any report the court requires.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-312.
Duties of guardian for adult.

A guardian for an adult is a fiduciary. Except as otherwise limited by the court, a guardian for an adult shall make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the ward to the extent necessitated by the adult’s limitations.

A guardian for an adult promotes the self-determination of the adult and, to the extent reasonably feasible, encourages the adult to participate in decisions, act on the adult’s own behalf, and develop or regain the capacity to manage the adult’s personal affairs. In furtherance of this duty, the guardian may:

Become personally acquainted with the adult and maintain sufficient contact with the adult through regular visitation and other means, and to know the adult’s abilities, limitations, needs, opportunities, and physical and mental health;

To the extent reasonably feasible, identify the values and preferences of the adult and involve the adult in decisions affecting the adult, including decisions about the adult’s care, dwelling, activities, or social interactions; and

Make reasonable efforts to identify and facilitate supportive relationships and services for the adult.

A guardian for an adult at all times shall exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence when acting on behalf of or making decisions for the adult. In furtherance of this duty, the guardian shall:

Take reasonable care of the personal effects, pets, and service or support animals of the adult and bring a proceeding for a conservatorship if necessary to protect the adult’s property;

Expend funds and other property of the adult received by the guardian for the adult’s current needs for support, care, education, health, and welfare;

Conserve any funds and other property of the adult not expended under paragraph (b) for the adult’s future needs, but if a conservator has been appointed for the adult, pay the funds and other property at least quarterly to the conservator to be conserved for the adult’s future needs; and

Monitor the quality of services, including long-term care services, provided to the adult.

In making a decision for a ward, the guardian must make the decision the guardian reasonably believes the adult would make if the adult were able unless doing so would unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the adult. To determine the decision the ward would make if able, the guardian shall consider the adult’s previous or current directions, preferences, opinions, values, and actions, to the extent actually known or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian.

If a guardian for an adult cannot make a decision under subsection (4) because the guardian does not know and cannot reasonably determine the decision the adult probably would make if able, or the guardian reasonably believes the decision the adult would make would unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the adult, the guardian must act in accordance with the best interest of the adult. In determining the best interest of the adult, the guardian may consider:

Information received from professionals and persons that demonstrate sufficient interest in the welfare of the adult;

Other information the guardian believes the adult would have considered if the adult were able to act; and

Other factors a reasonable person in the circumstances of the adult would consider, including consequences for others.

A guardian for an adult immediately must notify the court if the condition of the adult has changed so that the adult is capable of exercising rights previously removed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-313.
Powers of guardian for adult.

Except as limited by court order, a guardian for an adult may:

Apply for and receive funds and benefits for the support of the adult, unless a conservator is appointed for the adult and the application or receipt is within the powers of the conservator;

Unless inconsistent with a court order, establish the adult’s place of dwelling;

Consent to health or other care, treatment, or service for the adult;

If a conservator for the adult has not been appointed, commence a proceeding, including an administrative proceeding, or take other appropriate action to compel a person to support the adult or pay funds for the adult’s benefit;

To the extent reasonable, delegate to the adult responsibility for a decision affecting the adult’s well-being; and

Receive personally identifiable health-care information regarding the adult.

In exercising a guardian’s power under subsection (1)(b) to establish the adult’s place of dwelling, the guardian must:

Select a residential setting the guardian believes the adult would select if the adult were able, in accordance with the decision-making standard in Section 93-20-312(4) and (5). If the guardian does not know and cannot reasonably determine what setting the ward likely would choose if able, or if the guardian reasonably believes the decision the adult would make would unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the adult, the guardian must choose in accordance with Section 93-20-312(5) a residential setting that is consistent with the adult’s best interest;

In selecting among residential settings, give priority to a residential setting in a location that will allow the adult to interact with persons important to the adult and meet the adult’s needs in the least restrictive manner reasonably feasible unless to do so would be inconsistent with the decision-making standard in Section 93-20-312(4) and (5);

Establish or move the permanent place of dwelling of the adult to a nursing home, mental-health facility, or other facility that places restrictions on the adult’s ability to leave or have visitors only if:

The establishment or move is in the guardian’s plan under Section 93-20-315;

The court authorizes the establishment or move; or

The guardian gives notice of the establishment or move at least fourteen (14) days before the establishment or move to the adult and all persons entitled to notice under Section 93-20-309(4) or court order, and no objection is filed;

Establish or move the place of dwelling of the adult outside this state only if consistent with the guardian’s plan and authorized by the court by specific order;

Take action that would result in the sale of or surrender of the lease to the primary dwelling of the adult only if:

The action is specifically included in the guardian’s plan under Section 93-20-315;

The court authorizes the action by specific order; or

Notice of the action was given at least fourteen (14) days before the action to the adult and all persons entitled to the notice under Section 93-20-309(4) or court order and no objection has been filed; and

Notify the court that the adult’s dwelling or permanent residence has become so damaged by fire, flood, or other emergency circumstance that the guardian has had to temporarily or permanently relocate the adult to another residential setting.

In exercising a guardian’s power under subsection (1)(c) to make health-care decisions, the guardian shall:

Involve the adult in decision-making to the extent reasonably feasible, including, when practicable, by encouraging and supporting the adult in understanding the risks and benefits of health-care options;

Defer to a decision by an agent under an advanced healthcare directive executed by the adult and cooperate to the extent feasible with the agent making the decision; and

Take into account:

The risks and benefits of treatment options; and

The current and previous wishes and values of the adult, if known or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-314.
Special limitations on guardian’s power.

Unless authorized by the court by specific order, a guardian for an adult does not have the power to revoke or amend an advanced health-care directive or power of attorney for finances executed by the adult. If an advanced health-care directive is in effect, unless there is a court order to the contrary, a health-care decision of an agent takes precedence over that of the guardian and the guardian must cooperate with the agent to the extent feasible. If a power of attorney for finances is in effect, unless there is a court order to the contrary, a decision by the agent which the agent is authorized to make under the power of attorney for finances takes precedence over that of the guardian and the guardian must cooperate with the agent to the extent feasible.

A guardian for an adult may not initiate the commitment of the adult to a mental health facility except in accordance with the state’s procedure for involuntary civil commitment.

A guardian for an adult may not restrict the ability of the adult to communicate, visit, or interact with others, including receiving visitors and making or receiving telephone calls, personal mail, or electronic communications, including through social media, or participating in social activities, unless:

Authorized by the court by specific order;

A protective order is in effect that limits contact between the adult and a person; or

The guardian has good cause to believe restriction is necessary because interaction with a specified person poses a risk of significant physical, psychological, or financial harm to the adult and the restriction is:

For a period of not more than seven (7) business days if the person has a family or pre-existing social relationship with the adult; or

For a period of not more than sixty (60) days if the person does not have a family or pre-existing social relationship with the adult.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-315.
Guardian’s plan.

If required by the court, a guardian must file with the court a plan for the care of the adult no later than ninety (90) days after the court’s order of appointment or order to file a plan. If a plan is required and there is a significant change in circumstances, or if the guardian seeks to deviate significantly from the guardian’s plan, a guardian must file with the court a revised plan no later than ninety (90) days after the change in circumstances or decision to deviate from the plan. Every plan must be based on the needs of the adult and take into account the best interest of the adult as well as the adult’s preferences, values, and prior directions, to the extent known to or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian. Along with other items determined necessary by the court, the guardian’s plan must include:

The living arrangement, services, and supports the guardian expects to arrange, facilitate, or continue for the adult;

Social and educational activities the guardian expects to facilitate on behalf of the adult;

Any person with whom the adult has a close personal relationship or relationship involving regular visitation and any plan the guardian has for facilitating visits with the person;

The anticipated nature and frequency of the guardian’s visits and communication with the adult;

Goals for the adult, including any goal related to the restoration of the adult’s rights, and how the guardian anticipates achieving the goals;

Whether the adult has an existing plan and, if so, whether the guardian’s plan is consistent with the adult’s plan; and

A statement or list of the amount the guardian proposes to charge for each service the guardian anticipates providing to the adult.

A guardian must give reasonable notice of the filing of the guardian’s plan under subsection (1), and a copy of the plan, to the adult ward, the adult ward’s spouse, parents, children, and any other person the court determines. The notice must include a statement of the right to object to the plan and be given not later than fourteen (14) days after the filing.

After the guardian’s plan filed under this section is approved by the court, the guardian must provide a copy of the plan to the adult ward, the adult ward’s spouse, parents, children, and any other person the court determines.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-316.
Guardian’s well-being report; monitoring of guardianship.

If there is a significant change in circumstances, or if the guardian seeks to deviate significantly from the guardian’s plan, a guardian must file with the court a report in a record regarding the condition of the adult and accounting for funds and other property in the guardian’s possession or subject to the guardian’s control within ninety (90) days after being so ordered by the court.

A report under subsection (1) must state:

The mental, physical, and social condition of the adult;

The living arrangements of the adult during the reporting period;

A summary of any technological assistance, medical services, educational and vocational services, and other supports and services provided to the adult and the guardian’s opinion as to the adequacy of the adult’s care;

A summary of the guardian’s visits with the adult, including the dates of the visits;

Action taken on behalf of the adult;

The extent to which the adult has participated in decision-making;

If the adult is living in a mental health facility or living in a facility that provides the adult with health-care or other personal services, whether the guardian considers the facility’s current plan for support, care, treatment, or habilitation consistent with the adult’s preferences, values, prior directions, and best interest;

Any business relation the guardian has with a person the guardian has paid or that has benefited from the property of the adult;

A copy of the guardian’s most recently approved plan under Section 93-20-315 and a statement whether the guardian has deviated from the plan and, if so, how the guardian has deviated and why;

Plans for future care and support of the adult;

A recommendation as to the need for continued guardianship and any recommended change in the scope of the guardianship, when determined applicable by the court;

Whether any co-guardian or successor guardian appointed to serve when a designated event occurs is alive and able to serve;

Photographs of the adult ward and the adult ward’s living conditions, as required by the court at its discretion; and

Any amounts requested for reimbursement by the guardian of fees related to the administration of the guardianship or legal fees incurred for matters related to the guardianship.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to review a report submitted under this section or any guardian’s plan submitted under Section 93-20-315, interview the guardian or ward, or investigate any other matter involving the guardianship.

Notice of the filing under this section of a guardian’s well-being report, together with a copy of the report, must be given to the adult ward, the adult ward’s spouse, parents, children, and any other person the court determines. The notice and report must be delivered not later than fourteen (14) days after the filing.

The court must establish procedures for monitoring a report submitted under this section and review each report at least annually to determine whether:

The report provides sufficient information to establish if the guardian has complied with the guardian’s duties;

The guardianship should continue; and

The guardian’s requested fees, if any, should be approved.

If the court determines there is reason to believe a guardian for an adult has not complied with the guardian’s duties or the guardianship should be modified or terminated, the court:

Shall notify the adult ward, the adult ward’s spouse, parents, children, and persons entitled to notice under Section 93-20-309(4) or a court order;

May appoint a guardian ad litem to interview the adult or guardian or investigate any matter involving the guardianship; and

May hold a hearing to consider removal of the guardian, termination of the guardianship, or a change in the powers granted to the guardian or terms of the guardianship.

A guardian for an adult may petition the court for approval of a report filed under this section. The court after review may approve the report. If the court approves the report, there is a rebuttable presumption the report is accurate as to a matter adequately disclosed in the report.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-317.
Removal of guardian for adult; appointment of successor.

Upon petition and for good cause shown, the court may hold a hearing to consider whether to remove a guardian for an adult for failure to perform the guardian’s duties and appoint a successor guardian to assume the duties of guardian.

Notice of a petition under this section must be given to the ward, the guardian, and any other person the court determines.

A ward who seeks to remove the guardian and have a successor guardian appointed has the right to choose an attorney for representation in this matter. The court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the attorney for the adult as provided in Section 93-20-118.

Not later than ten (10) days after appointing a successor guardian, the court shall give notice of the appointment to the adult ward, the adult ward’s spouse, parents, children, and any person entitled to notice under a court order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-318.
Termination or modification of guardianship for adult.

Upon petition and for good cause shown, the court may hold a hearing to consider whether termination of the guardianship exists on the ground that a basis for appointment under Section 93-20-301 does not exist or termination would be in the best interest of the adult or for other good cause; or modification of the guardianship exists on the ground that the extent of protection or assistance granted is not appropriate or for other good cause.

Notice of a petition under this section must be given to the ward, the guardian, and any other person the court determines.

On presentation of prima facie evidence for termination of a guardianship for an adult, the court shall order termination unless it is proven that a basis for appointment of a guardian under Section 93-20-301 exists.

The court shall modify the powers granted to a guardian for an adult if the powers are excessive or inadequate due to a change in the abilities or limitations of the adult, the adult’s supports, or other circumstances.

Unless the court otherwise orders for good cause shown, before terminating or modifying a guardianship for an adult, the court shall follow the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the adult which apply to a petition for guardianship.

A ward who seeks to terminate or modify the terms of the guardianship has the right to choose an attorney for representation in the matter. The court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the attorney for the adult as provided in Section 93-20-118.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.